District of Columbia statutes.
24-251.07

Report to Council.

The Director shall submit to the Council’s Committee on Public Safety, semiannually (on January 31st and July 31st of each year), a report on the furlough program conducted during the immediately preceding period. The report shall include the number of furloughs granted during such reporting period, the types of furloughs so granted, a listing of all instances where a furloughed resident failed to abide by the conditions of his furlough, an analysis of each of the furloughed residents, giving the sex, sentence data, and other relevant information relating to each such resident, and such other information as the Director may deem necessary and relevant. The Director shall formulate an overall evaluation and submit same as a part of the report required by this section.

Apr. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 1-130, § 8, 23 DCR 9694
1981 Ed., § 24-487.
1973 Ed., § 24-487.